Maine, session 132, LD1002.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §14 is enacted to read:
§14. Student identification
Notwithstanding Title 5, chapter 337, personnel of a public school and public charter
school authorized under chapter 112 shall refer to a minor student by the name and gender
listed on the student's official record of birth submitted to the school at the time of
enrollment pursuant to section 6002 unless the minor student's parent provides written
permission stating otherwise or documentation of a legal change of name or gender is
provided to the school.